Utah statutes.
15-8-4.   Inapplicability of other laws -- Exempted transactions.

(1)  Rental purchase agreements that comply with this chapter are not governed by the laws relating to:

(a)  a security interest as defined in Subsection 70A-1a-201(2)(ii); or

(b)  Title 70C, Utah Consumer Credit Code, except that Sections 70C-7-102 through 70C-7-104 and 70C-2-205 shall apply to lessors as defined in this chapter to the same extent as they apply to creditors under Title 70C.

(2)  The chapter does not apply to the following:

(a)  rental purchase agreements primarily for business, commercial, or agricultural purposes, or those made with governmental agencies or instrumentalities or with organizations;

(b)  a lease of a safe deposit box;

(c)  a lease or bailment of personal property which is incidental to the lease of real property and which provides that the consumer has no option to purchase the leased property; or

(d)  a lease of a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102.

